Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.165

Additional actions against license.

In addition to any other grounds, the commission may take action against a license issued under this chapter and chapters 18.64A, 69.38, 69.41, 69.43, 69.45, and 69.50 RCW, except nonresident pharmacies, upon proof that:

(1) The license was procured through fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

(2) Except as provided in RCW 9.97.020, the licensee has violated or has permitted any employee to violate any of the laws of this state or the United States relating to drugs, controlled substances, cosmetics, or nonprescription drugs, or has violated any of the rules and regulations of the commission or has been convicted of a felony.

[ 2024 c 121 s 37; 2016 c 81 s 10; 2013 c 19 s 14; 1995 c 319 s 5. Prior: 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 404; 1989 c 352 s 4; 1979 c 90 s 14; 1963 c 38 s 15.]

NOTES:

Finding—Conflict with federal requirements—2016 c 81: See notes following RCW 9.97.010.

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Violation of chapter 69.50 RCW, the Uniform Controlled Substances Act—Suspension of license: RCW 69.50.413.